Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 5
INTERMENT OF VETERANS

Editor's note:

This part 5 was numbered as article 2 of chapter 144, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this part 5 were repealed and reenacted in 2002, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 5 prior to 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

28-5-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "Interment of Deceased Veterans Act of 2002".

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 240, § 1, effective April 12.

28-5-502. Interment of deceased veterans.

It is the duty of the county commissioners in each county of this state to designate some proper person in each county whose duty it is to cause the decent interment of the bodies of honorably discharged military personnel and discharged LGBT veterans:

Who died without leaving sufficient means to defray funeral expenses; or

Who died leaving a family in indigent circumstances; and

Who served in any branch of the armed forces of the United States during any period of any declared or any undeclared war or other armed hostilities against an armed foreign enemy; or

Who served on active duty in any branch of the armed services in any campaign or expedition for which a campaign badge is authorized.

Burial must not be made in that portion of a cemetery or burial ground used exclusively for the burial of deceased indigent persons. Each county, by resolution of its board of county commissioners, shall establish the maximum expense to the county for each burial, exclusive of any federal funds provided for such purposes. In case the deceased veteran has relatives or friends who desire to conduct the funeral services, they shall be permitted to do so, and the expenses shall be paid as provided in this section.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 240, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (HB 18-1142), ch. 65, p. 618, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 176, § 10, effective November 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 28-5-501 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1142, see section 1 of chapter 65, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

(2) For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

28-5-503. Headstone to mark graves.

The county commissioners shall also see that headstones furnished by the veterans administration or furnished on behalf of the veterans described in section 28-5-502 shall be set at the expense of the county. Each county, by resolution of its board of county commissioners, shall establish the maximum expense to the county for setting such headstones.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 241, § 1, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 28-5-502 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-504. County of residence.

If the expenses of burial and setting of headstones are paid by the county in which the deceased person is buried, but such deceased person resided in another county in this state at the time of death, the county of residence shall reimburse such expenses to the county wherein the deceased is buried. Such expenses shall be audited and paid as other accounts are audited and paid by the county.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 241, § 1, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 28-5-503 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-505. Cemetery subdivision - state may acquire and maintain.

The state has authority to acquire, establish, maintain, and improve in any cemetery in the state a suitable subdivision to be used as a burial place for honorably discharged veterans and discharged LGBT veterans. Such subdivision must consist of lots, each of sufficient area to accommodate at least eight interments of deceased veterans. No charge shall be made for burial space in such subdivision.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 241, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 176, § 11, effective November 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 28-5-504 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

28-5-506. Care and custody of cemetery subdivision.

The care, custody, maintenance, improvement, management, and control of the subdivision referred to in section 28-5-505 may be vested by the state in the city, town, city and county, or county where the subdivision is established, but such vestment may also be delegated by the state to a military veteran service organization.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part R&RE, p. 241, § 1, effective April 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 28-5-509 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-507. Veterans service organization stipend - funeral services - process - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Congressionally chartered veterans service organization" means an organization that aids and serves veterans and service members and their dependents and survivors, has been granted a charter by the United States congress through the enactment of a public law, and is included in the list of patriotic and national organizations in 36 U.S.C. sec. 20101, et seq.

"Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-127.

"Local veterans service organization" means an auxiliary, local unit, or division of a congressionally chartered veterans service organization, operating in Colorado.

The department shall pay, subject to available appropriations, up to seventy-five dollars, referred to in this section as a "stipend", to a local veterans service organization for each time the organization provides an honor guard detail to perform any of the following services at the funeral of a deceased honorably discharged veteran:

A basic military funeral honors ceremony, as described in subsection (3)(a) of this section; or

Any other funeral-related services and personnel, including but not limited to pallbearers, rifle teams, and chaplain or religious services.

The department shall pay a seventy-five-dollar stipend to a local veterans service organization for services performed at each funeral but may decrease the amount of the stipend paid for services performed at a second or subsequent funeral when an organization performs services at more than one funeral on the same day. When determining the amount of the stipend for services at a second or subsequent funeral, the department shall consider the actual expenses incurred by the organization and its members for providing the services, including mileage and transportation costs and meals.

In order to receive a stipend for providing services at a funeral, a local veterans service organization must request the stipend pursuant to the process established by the department.

The basic military funeral honors ceremony for a veteran consists of folding and presenting the United States flag to the veteran's family, if family members are available, and playing taps. Taps must be played by a bugler or, if a bugler is not available, by using a high-quality recorded version.

If the local veterans service organization provides a student to play taps, the organization may pay some or all of the seventy-five dollars to the student.

On or before January 15, 2022, the department shall create a process for a local veterans service organization to apply for and receive a stipend. In addition to any other requirements, the process must require the organization to:

Request the stipend within fifteen days after providing the funeral services;

Provide the name of the deceased veteran for which the services were performed;

Describe the services performed; and

If the organization is seeking a stipend for services performed at a second or subsequent funeral on the same day as another funeral, submit the amount of actual expenses incurred by the organization and its members for providing the services, including mileage and transportation costs and meals.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-015), ch. 188, p. 1003, § 2, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (5), effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 1005.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-015, see section 1 of chapter 188, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.